Utah statutes.
76-6-108.   Damage to or interruption of a communication device -- Penalty.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Communication device" means any device, including a telephone, cellular
telephone, computer, or radio, which may be used in an attempt to summon
police, fire, medical, or other emergency aid.
(b)  "Emergency aid" means aid or assistance, including law enforcement, fire,
or medical services, commonly summoned by persons concerned with imminent or
actual:
(i)  jeopardy to any person's health or safety; or
(ii)  damage to any person's property.
(2)  A person is guilty of damage to or interruption of a communication device
if the actor attempts to prohibit or interrupt, or prohibits or interrupts,
another person's use of a communication device when the other person is
attempting to summon emergency aid or has communicated a desire to summon
emergency aid, and in the process the actor:
(a)  uses force, intimidation, or any other form of violence;
(b)  destroys, disables, or damages a communication device; or
(c)  commits any other act in an attempt to prohibit or interrupt the person's
use of a communication device to summon emergency aid.
(3)  Damage to or interruption of a communication device is a class B
misdemeanor.
